Utah statutes.
7-5-11.   Self-dealing with trust property -- Own stock as trust property --
Policies for dealing with trust securities.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 7-5-7, in Title 75, or as authorized under
the instrument creating the relationship, a trust company may not invest funds
held as an agent or fiduciary in stock or obligations of, or with such funds
acquire property from, the trust company or any of its directors, officers or
employees, nor shall a trust company sell property held as an agent or
fiduciary to the company or to any of its directors, officers, or employees.
(2)  A trust company may retain and vote stock of the trust company or of any
of its affiliates received by it as assets of any trust account or in any
other fiduciary relationship of which it is appointed agent or fiduciary,
unless the instrument creating the relationship otherwise provides.
(3)  Every trust company shall adopt written policies and procedures regarding
decisions or recommendations to purchase or sell any security to facilitate
compliance with federal and state securities laws.  These policies and
procedures, in particular, shall prohibit the trust company from using
material inside information in connection with any decision or recommendation
to purchase or sell any security.
